Illinois, session 104th, HB1664.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-101.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-101.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 1-101.1)7    Sec. 1-101.1. Definitions. For purposes of this Article, 8unless the the context otherwise requires, the words defined 9in the Sections following this Section and preceding Section 101-102 shall have meanings given in those Sections.11(Source: P.A. 90-507, eff. 8-22-97.)